Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8436.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-3-13.5 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-3 entitled "Property
Subject to Taxation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-3-13.5. Glocester — Exemption of elderly and disabled persons.
(a) The town council of Glocester may, by ordinance, issue a tax credit for real property
situated in the town of Glocester which is owned and occupied by owners over sixty-five (65) years
of age or under sixty-five (65) years of age who are permanently disabled in an amount of one
thousand one hundred fifty dollars ($1,150) adjusted annually by the rate of the annual tax increase,
if any, times the per one thousand dollar ($1,000) average valuation of the exempted real properties
and in like manner may also by ordinance issue a tax credit for real property situated in the town
which is owned and occupied by owners with a combined adjusted gross taxable annual income
not to exceed twenty-three thousand dollars ($23,000) adjusted annually by the consumer price
index — all urban customers (CPI-U) published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United
States Department of Labor as set forth in the following schedule:
(1) Owners who are sixty-five (65) but less than eighty (80) years of age: — an additional
tax credit not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500);
(2) Owners who are eighty (80) years of age or older: — an additional tax credit not to
exceed four thousand five hundred ($4,500).
(b) The exemption shall be pro-rated among the owners of the real property and shall be in

addition to any and all other exemptions from taxation to which the person may be otherwise
entitled. The exemption shall be applied uniformly. Only one exemption shall be granted to co-
tenants, joint tenants, and tenants by the entirety, even though all of the co-tenants, joint tenants,
and tenants by the entirety are eligible for an exemption. The provisions of this section apply
notwithstanding the provisions of § 44-3-15.
Notwithstanding any provision of the general laws to the contrary, the town of Glocester
may, by ordinance, provide for exemptions or tax credits for real property situated in the town and
owned and occupied by qualified persons as follows:
(1) The town council may establish exemptions or tax credits for real property owned and
occupied by qualified persons including, but not limited to:
(i) A base exemption for real property owned and occupied by persons sixty-five (65) years
of age or older, or under sixty-five (65) years of age who are permanently disabled, in an amount
not to exceed two thousand seventy dollars ($2,070), which amount shall be adjusted annually by
the consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U). The town may, by ordinance, establish
and modify the required length of legal residency within the town of Glocester as a condition of
eligibility for this exemption including, but not limited to, minimum consecutive years of residency
immediately preceding application.
(ii) An additional exemption for real property owned and occupied by persons eighty (80)
years of age or older, in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), which amount may
be adjusted by ordinance. The town of Glocester may, by ordinance, establish and modify the
required length of residency within the town for eligibility for this exemption, as well as any
required duration of ownership and occupancy of the subject property.
(iii) A minimum tax provision requiring that any qualified owner-occupant receiving an
exemption shall pay not less than a minimum annual tax amount as may be established by
ordinance.
(iv) A variable income exemption for qualified owner-occupants who received such
exemption prior to a date established by ordinance, with income thresholds, exclusions, and
administration as established by ordinance, including annual verification requirements.
(v) Authority to adjust income eligibility thresholds annually based on the CPI-U or a
regional equivalent, as provided by ordinance.
(vi) No income limitation shall apply to exemptions granted under subsections (a)(1)(i) and
(a)(1)(ii) of this section for applicants qualifying after a date established by ordinance.
(b) Consumer price index (CPI) adjustments shall be calculated using a non-compounded
methodology, applying each annual percentage change solely to the original base amount.
LC006307 - Page 2 of 4

(c) The town council may, by ordinance, establish and enforce all qualifications and
eligibility criteria including, but not limited to:
(1) Age requirements;
(2) Length of residency within the town, including authority to set different residency
requirements for different exemption categories;
(3) Ownership and occupancy requirements, including principal residence limitations;
(4) Legal domicile requirements;
(5) Disability status and verification, including physician certification;
(6) Income and asset limitations, including definitions and exclusions;
(7) Duration of ownership or occupancy of the property;
(8) Grandfathering provisions or date-based eligibility distinctions;
(9) Household composition or co-ownership considerations;
(10) Application procedures, deadlines, and renewal requirements;
(11) Documentation and verification requirements; and
(12) Any other reasonable qualification or administrative standard necessary to implement
the exemptions.
(d) The exemptions shall be prorated among the owners, applied uniformly, limited to one
exemption per property, and shall be in addition to any other exemptions otherwise authorized.
(e) This section shall apply notwithstanding the provisions of § 44-3-15.
(f) The exemptions authorized herein may be provided in addition to, in lieu of, or in
combination with any other exemptions authorized by law or ordinance.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage and shall apply to assessments as of
December 31, 2025, and thereafter, for use in the tax roll for fiscal year 2026–2027 and thereafter.
========
LC006307
========
LC006307 - Page 3 of 4